Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 29. Revised Mississippi Limited Liability Company Act

Laws of 2010, ch. 532, § 3, which repealed the Mississippi Limited Liability Company Act (codified in Chapter 29 of Title 79) effective from and after January 1, 2011, provides:

“SECTION 3. Sections 79-29-101, 79-29-102, 79-29-103, 79-29-104, 79-29-105, 79-29-106, 79-29-107, 79-29-108, 79-29-109, 79-29-110, 79-29-111, 79-29-112, 79-29-201, 79-29-202, 79-29-203, 79-29-204, 79-29-205, 79-29-206, 79-29-207, 79-29-208, 79-29-209, 79-29-210, 79-29-211, 79-29-212, 79-29-213, 79-29-214, 79-29-301, 79-29-302, 79-29-303, 79-29-304, 79-29-305, 79-29-306, 79-29-307, 79-29-308, 79-29-401, 79-29-402, 79-29-403, 79-29-50179-29-502, 79-29-503, 79-29-504, 79-29-601, 79-29-602, 79-29-603, 79-29-604, 79-29-605, 79-29-606, 79-29-701, 79-29-702, 79-29-703, 79-29-704, 79-29-705, 79-29-801, 79-29-802, 79-29-803, 79-29-804, 79-29-805, 79-29-806, 79-29-807, 79-29-901, 79-29-902, 79-29-903, 79-29-904, 79-29-905, 79-29-906, 79-29-907, 79-29-908, 79-29-909, 79-29-910, 79-29-911, 79-29-912, 79-29-913, 79-29-914, 79-29-915, 79-29-917, 79-29-918, 79-29-919, 79-29-920, 79-29-921, 79-29-922, 79-29-923, 79-29-924, 79-29-925, 79-29-926, 79-29-930, 79-29-931, 79-29-933, 79-29-1001, 79-29-1002, 79-29-1003, 79-29-1004, 79-29-1005, 79-29-1006, 79-29-1007, 79-29-1008, 79-29-1009, 79-29-1010, 79-29-1101, 79-29-1102, 79-29-1103, 79-29-1104, 79-29-1105, 79-29-1106, 79-29-1107, 79-29-1201, 79-29-1202, 79-29-1203 and 79-29-1204, Mississippi Code of 1972, which comprise the Mississippi Limited Liability Company Act, are hereby repealed.”

Former Chapter 29 of Title 79 contained the following Articles:

Article 1, which was entitled “General Provisions” and included former §§ 79-29-101 through 79-29-112 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, §§ 1 through 12, effective from and after July 1, 1994].

Article 2, which was entitled “Formation, certificate of formation” and included former §§ 79-29-201 through 79-29-210 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, §§ 13 through 21, effective from and after July 1, 1994] and former §§ 79-29-210 through 79-29-214 [Laws, 2000, ch. 469, §§ 45 through 49, effective from and after July 1, 2000].

Article 3, which was entitled “Members” and included former §§ 79-29-301 through 79-29-308 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, §§ 22 through 29, effective from and after July 1, 1994].

Article 4, which was entitled “Management” and included former §§ 79-29-401 through 79-29-403 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, §§ 30 through 32, effective from and after July 1, 1994].

Article 5, which was entitled “Finance” and included former §§ 79-29-501 through 79-29-504 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, §§ 33 through 36, effective from and after July 1, 1994].

Article 6, which was entitled “Distributions” and included former §§ 79-29-601 through 79-29-606 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, §§ 37 through 42, effective from and after July 1, 1994].

Article 7, which was entitled “Assignment of Limited Liability Company Interests” and included former §§ 79-29-701 through 79-29-705 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, §§ 43 through 47, effective from and after July 1, 1994].

Article 8, which was entitled “Dissolution” and included former §§ 79-29-801 through 79-29-807 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, §§ 48 through 54, effective from and after July 1, 1994].

Article 9, which was entitled “Professional Limited Liability Companies” and included former §§ 79-29-901 through 79-29-912 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 55 through 66, effective from and after July 1, 1994] and former §§ 79-29-913 through 79-29-933 [Laws, 1995, ch. 494, §§ 48 through 63, eff from and after July 1, 1995].

Article 10, which was entitled “Foreign Limited Liability Companies” and included former §§ 79-29-1001 through 79-29-1010 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, §§ 67 through 76, effective from and after July 1, 1994].

Article 11, which was entitled “Derivative Actions” and included former §§ 79-29-1101 through 1107 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, §§ 77 through 83, effective from and after July 1, 1994].

Article 12, which was entitled ‘Miscellaneous‘ and included former §§ 79-29-1201 through 79-29-1204 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, §§ 84 through 87, effective from and after July 1, 1994].

Laws of 2010, ch. 532, § 1, effective from and after January 1, 2011, enacted a new Chapter 29 of Title 79, (§§ 79-29-101 through 79-29-1211) which contains similar provisions.